Utah statutes.
67-19-15.6.   Longevity salary increases.

(1)  Except for those employees in schedule AB, IN, or TL as provided under Section 67-19-15, an employee shall receive an increase in salary of 2.75% if that employee:

(a)  holds a position under schedule A or B as provided under Section 67-19-15;

(b)  has reached the maximum of the salary range in the position classification;

(c)  has been employed with the state for eight years; and

(d)  is rated eligible in job performance under guidelines established by the executive director.

(2)  Any employee who meets the criteria under Subsection (1) is entitled to the same increase in salary for each additional three years of employment if the employee maintains the eligibility standards established by the department.

